Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.064

[Art. 7] Apprehension.

(1) Apprehension is the taking of a person into custody.

(2) Any person authorized by this code, or by regulations issued under it, to apprehend persons subject to this code, any marshal of a court-martial appointed pursuant to the provisions of this code, and any peace officer authorized to do so by law, may do so upon reasonable belief that an offense has been committed and that the person apprehended committed it.

(3) Commissioned officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers have authority to quell quarrels, frays, and disorders among persons subject to this code and to apprehend persons subject to this code who take part therein.

[ 1989 c 48 s 7; 1963 c 220 s 7.]